Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1357.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1207 and 1820 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 1207. Peace Officers; No Police Officer or Federal Law Enforcement Official to Be Within One Hundred Feet of Polling Place; Exceptions; Presence of Soldiers Prohibited.--The election officers, or any three qualified electors of any 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 election district, may call upon any mayor, chief burgess, sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable, deputy constable, or police officer, to clear an avenue to the door of any polling place which is obstructed in such a way as to prevent electors from approaching, or to maintain order and quell any disturbance, if such arises. No police officer [in commission] or Federal law enforcement official, whether in uniform or in citizen's clothes, shall be within one hundred feet of a polling place or ballot return site during the conduct of any primary or election, unless in the exercise of his privilege of voting, [or for the purpose of serving warrants, or unless called upon to preserve the peace,] as provided by this act: Provided, however, That such prohibition shall not apply to such police officers assigned to a police station or headquarters located in a building or on the premises where the polling place is located and such police officers must be within one hundred (100) feet of the polling place to enter and exit such police station or headquarters: And provided further, That in no event may any police officer or Federal law enforcement official unlawfully use or practice any intimidation, threats, force or violence nor, in any manner, unduly influence or overawe any elector or prevent him from voting or restrain his freedom of choice, nor may any such police officer or Federal law enforcement official electioneer or directly or indirectly attempt to influence the election or electors while within one hundred (100) feet of a polling place or ballot return site as herein set forth: And provided further, That where polling places or ballot return sites are located in buildings or on premises where a police station or headquarters are located, the polling place or ballot return site shall be located in a separate room. No body of 20260SB1357PN1768 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 troops in the Army of the United States or of this Commonwealth shall be present, either armed or unarmed, at any place of election or ballot return site within this Commonwealth during the time of any primary or election: Provided, however, That no officer or soldier shall be prevented from exercising the right of suffrage in the election district in which he resides, if otherwise qualified.Section 1820. Police Officers at Polling Places.--Any police officer [in commission] or Federal law enforcement official, whether in uniform or in citizen's clothes, who shall be within one hundred (100) feet of a polling place or ballot return site during the conduct of any primary or election, except in the exercise of his privilege of voting [or for the purpose of serving warrants], or in accordance with the provisions of the exception set forth in section 1207 of this act where the police station or headquarters is located in the same building or on the premises where the polling place or ballot return site is located [or unless called upon to preserve the peace], as provided by this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five hundred ($500)] three thousand ($3,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than one (1) year, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1357PN1768 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324